Utah statutes.
75-3-109.   Letters upon several estates jointly.

(1) Upon petition by any person interested in two or more estates, the court may, after notice and hearing, grant letters upon these estates jointly if administration has not commenced with respect to any such estate and if:

(a)  All or any part of the estate of one decedent has descended from another decedent; or

(b)  Two or more decedents held any property during their lifetimes as tenants-in-common and if the persons entitled under the wills of these decedents or under the law of intestate succession to receive the estates of these decedents are the same.

(2)  If letters are granted upon two or more estates jointly under this section, these estates shall be administered the same as if they were but one estate except that claims may be enforced only against the estate to which they relate.

